Rhode Island, session 2025, SB845.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 40 of the General Laws entitled "HUMAN SERVICES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 23
RHODE ISLAND MEALS ON WHEELS INC. FUND
40-23-1. Rhode Island Meals on Wheels Inc. Fund established.
(a) There is hereby established a separate fund within the general fund to be called the
Rhode Island Meals on Wheels Inc. Fund, which shall be administered by the general treasurer in
accordance with the same laws and fiscal procedures as the general fund of the state. The fund shall
consist of sums collected as a result of the taxpayer check-off as provided for in chapter 30 of title
44. The general treasurer is authorized to accept any grant, devise, bequest, donation, gift, or
assignment of money, bonds, or other valuable securities for deposit in and credit of the Rhode
Island Meals on Wheels Inc. Fund.
(b) The monies received under this chapter and § 44-30-2.13 shall be made available by
the treasurer annually by September 30 to the Rhode Island Meals on Wheels Inc. Fund.
(c) Upon distribution, the monies shall be used exclusively for those individuals and/or
families who are eligible.
(d) The director of the department of health is hereby authorized to promulgate any rules
or regulations and prescribe forms necessary to facilitate the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 2. Chapter 44-30 of the General Laws entitled "Personal Income Tax" is hereby

amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-30-2.13. Refund deduction for contribution to the Meals on Wheels Inc. Fund.
(a) There shall be provided as a deduction from any refund from the Rhode Island personal
income tax otherwise due to a taxpayer for a taxable year a contribution to the Meals on Wheels
Inc. Fund established in chapter 23 of title 40. The provision for the contribution shall appear on
the state personal income tax return as follows:
Meals on Wheels Inc. Fund. Check if you wish to contribute () (write in amount of your
tax REFUND for this program).
(b) The tax administrator shall annually forward by August 1 all contributions made to the
Meals on Wheels Inc. Fund to the general treasurer to be deposited in the fund and the treasurer
shall annually distribute the proceeds of said fund as provided in chapter 23 of title 40.
(c) The provisions of this section shall commence for returns filed for the tax year ending
December 31, 2025.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002436
========
LC002436 - Page 2 of 3